Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.580

Authority for protective arrangement.

(1) Under this article, a court:

(a) On receiving a petition for a guardianship for an adult may order a protective arrangement instead of guardianship as a less restrictive alternative to guardianship; and

(b) On receiving a petition for a conservatorship for an individual may order a protective arrangement instead of conservatorship as a less restrictive alternative to conservatorship.

(2) A person interested in an adult's welfare, including the adult or a conservator for the adult, may petition under this article for a protective arrangement instead of guardianship.

(3) The following persons may petition under this article for a protective arrangement instead of conservatorship:

(a) The individual for whom the protective arrangement is sought;

(b) A person interested in the property, financial affairs, or welfare of the individual, including a person that would be affected adversely by lack of effective management of property or financial affairs of the individual; and

(c) The guardian for the individual.

[ 2019 c 437 s 501.]